Missouri, session 2026, SB1155.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.2000, to read as
follows:
173.2000. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Respond, Innovate, Succeed, and
Empower (RISE) Act".
2. Each public institution of higher education shall
adopt a policy that makes any of the following documentation
submitted by an enrolled or admitted student sufficient to
establish that the student is an individual with a
disability for purposes of determining such student's
eligibility for disability accommodations at such
institution:
(1) Documentation that the individual has had an
Individualized Education Program (IEP) in accordance with
the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, and that such IEP
represents an ongoing need for disability accommodations
that has not ended;

SB 1155 2
(2) Documentation that the individual has received
services or accommodations pursuant to Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as
amended, and that such services or accommodations represent
an ongoing need for disability accommodations that has not
ended;
(3) Documentation of a plan or record of service for
the individual from a private school, a local education
agency, a state educational agency, or an institution of
higher education provided in accordance with the Americans
with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et
seq., as amended;
(4) A record or evaluation from a relevant licensed
professional acting within the scope of practice for which
such professional is licensed finding that the individual
has a disability;
(5) A plan or record of a disability from another
institution of higher education; or
(6) Documentation of a disability due to military
service in the uniformed services.
3. A public institution of higher education may
establish less burdensome criteria than the criteria
prescribed in subsection 2 of this section to establish that
a student is an individual with a disability.
4. The policy adopted pursuant to this section shall
be transparent and explicit regarding information about the
process by which the public institution of higher education
shall determine the eligibility for accommodations for an
individual with a disability. Each public institution of
higher education shall disseminate such information to
students, parents, and faculty in accessible formats,
including during any student orientation, and shall make the

SB 1155 3
information readily available on a public website of the
institution.
5. The coordinating board for higher education may
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓